Hawaii statutes.
§50-15 Reserved powers.
Notwithstanding the provisions of this chapter, there is expressly reserved to
the state legislature the power to enact all laws of general application
throughout the State on matters of concern and interest and laws relating to the
fiscal powers of the counties, and neither a charter nor ordinances adopted
under a charter shall be in conflict therewith. [L 1963, c 73, pt of §2; Supp,
§143A-16; HRS §50-15]

Law Journals and Reviews

Marsland v. First Hawaiian Bank: Home Rule and the Scope of
the County Prosecutor's Power. 12 UH L. Rev. 261.

Case Notes

Generally on functions of statewide interest, if counties are
not given specific authority, they cannot thwart the State. 56 H. 582, 545
P.2d 684.

"On matters of concern and interest" should be
interpreted to mean "on matters of statewide concern and interest".
59 H. 65, 576 P.2d 1029.

Where a Hawaii county ordinance made the enforcement of
marijuana laws the lowest enforcement priority in the county, the ordinance
conflicted with the Hawaii Penal Code and covered the same subject matter that
the legislature intended to govern under chapter 329, and, therefore, was
preempted. 132 H. 511 (App.), 323 P.3d 155 (2014).

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next